es: Rol del jugador previsto: Receptor; Entrenador; Lanzador; Fildeador de sóftbol; Árbitro; Otro
sv: Avsedd spelarroll: Catcher; Tränare; Pitcher; Utespelare (softboll); Domare; Annat
cs: Zamýšlená role hráče: Chytač; Trenér; Nadhazovač; Polař v softballu; Rozhodčí; Jiné
da: Tilsigtet spillerrolle: Catcher; Træner; Pitcher; Softball fielder; Dommer; Andet
sk-SK: Zamýšľaná rola hráča: Catcher; Tréner; Nadhadzovač; Softbalový poliar; Rozhodca; Iné
lt-LT: Numatytas žaidėjo vaidmuo: Gaudytojas; Treneris; Metikas; Gynėjas; Teisėjas; Kita
ru: Предназначенная роль игрока: Кэтчер; Тренер; Питчер; Филдер в софтболе; Судья; Другое
ko: 선수 역할 용도: 포수; 코치; 투수; 소프트볼 야수; 심판; 기타
zh-TW: 適用場上角色: 捕手; 教練; 投手; 壘球防守員; 裁判; 其他
pt-BR: Função de jogador pretendida: Receptor; Treinador; Arremessador; Fielder de softball; Árbitro; Outra
pl: Przewidywana rola gracza: Łapacz; Trener; Miotacz; Gracz z pola (Softball); Sędzia; Inna
th: บทบาทของผู้เล่นที่ตั้งใจไว้: แคชเชอร์; โค้ช; พิตเชอร์; ผู้เล่นตำแหน่งฟิลเดอร์ซอฟต์บอล; กรรมการ; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Predviđena uloga igrača: Hvatač; Trener; Bacač; Igrač u polju (softball); Sudac; Ostalo
fr: Rôle prévu du joueur: Receveur; Entraîneur; Lanceur; Joueur de champ de softball; Arbitre; Autre
pt-PT: Função do jogador pretendido: Recetor; Treinador; Lançador; Fielder de softbol; Árbitro; Outro
vi: Vai trò người chơi dự định: Bắt bóng; Huấn luyện viên; Ném bóng; Hậu vệ bóng mềm; Trọng tài; Khác
nl: Beoogde spelersrol: Catcher; Coach; Pitcher; Velder (softbal); Scheidsrechter; Overig
ja: 想定されるプレイヤーの役割: キャッチャー; コーチ; ピッチャー; ソフトボールフィールダー; アンパイア; その他
it: Ruolo del giocatore previsto: Ricevitore; Allenatore; Lanciatore; Difensore di softball; Arbitro; Altro
bg-BG: Предвидена роля на играча: Кечър; Треньор; Питчър; Полеви играч (софтбол); Съдия; Други
sl-SI: Predvidena vloga igralca: Lovilec; Trener; Metalec; Poljski igralec (softball); Sodnik; Drugo
tr: Oyuncunun üstleneceği rol: Tutucu; Antrenör; Atıcı; Softbol alan oyuncusu; Hakem; Diğer
fi: Suunniteltu pelaajarooli: Sieppari; Valmentaja; Syöttäjä; Softballin ulkokenttäpelaaja; Tuomari; Muu
hu: Tervezett játékos szerepkör: Elkapó; Edző; Dobó; Mezőnyjátékos (softball); Játékvezető; Egyéb
ro-RO: Rolul jucătorului pentru care este destinat produsul: Prinzător; Antrenor; Aruncător; Jucător de câmp (softball); Arbitru; Altele
el: Προβλεπόμενος ρόλος παίκτη: Κάτσερ; Προπονητής; Πίτσερ; Παίκτης γηπέδου σόφτμπολ; Διαιτητής; Άλλο
en: Intended player role: Catcher; Coach; Pitcher; Softball Fielder; Umpire; Other
de: Vorgesehene Spielerrolle: Catcher; Coach; Pitcher; Softball-Fielder; Umpire; Sonstige
zh-CN: 适用玩家角色: 捕手; 教练; 投手; 垒球外野手; 裁判; 其他
nb: Tiltenkt spillerrolle: Catcher; Trener; Pitcher; Softballutespiller; Dommer; Annet